Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-304 Confidentiality. All
financial analysis ratios and examination synopses concerning insurance
companies that are submitted to the insurance division by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners' Insurance Regulatory Information System
are confidential and may not be disclosed by the insurance division. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next